Missouri, session 2026, HB1688.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 566.030, 566.031, 566.100, 566.101, 566.151, 566.206, 566.209,
566.210, 566.211, 573.025, 573.035, and 573.037, RSMo, are repealed and twelve new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 566.030, 566.031, 566.100, 566.101,
566.151, 566.206, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 573.025, 573.035, and 573.037, to read as
follows:
566.030. 1. A person commits the offense of rape in the first degree if he or she has
sexual intercourse with another person who is incapacitated, incapable of consent, or lacks the
capacity to consent, or by the use of forcible compulsion. Forcible compulsion includes the
use of a substance administered without a victim's knowledge or consent which renders the
victim physically or mentally impaired so as to be incapable of making an informed consent
to sexual intercourse.
2. The offense of rape in the first degree or an attempt to commit rape in the first
degree is a felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or [a
term of years not less than five years, unless:
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, in which case the authorized term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment or a term of years not less than fifteen years;
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual offender as defined in section
566.125 and subjected to an extended term of imprisonment under said section;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1688 2
(3) The victim is a child less than twelve years of age, in which case the required term
of imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole until the
offender has served not less than thirty years of such sentence or unless the offender has
reached the age of seventy-five years and has served at least fifteen years of such sentence,
unless such rape in the first degree is described under subdivision (4) of this subsection; or
(4) The victim is a child less than twelve years of age and such rape in the first degree
or attempt to commit rape in the first degree was outrageously or wantonly vile, horrible or
inhumane, in that it involved torture or depravity of mind, in which case the required term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for probation, parole or conditional
release.
3. Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to the sentence of a person who has
been found guilty of rape in the first degree or attempt to commit rape in the first degree when
the victim is less than twelve years of age, and "life imprisonment" shall mean imprisonment
for the duration of a person's natural life for the purposes of this section.
4. No person found guilty of rape in the first degree or an attempt to commit rape in
the first degree shall be granted a suspended imposition of sentence or suspended execution of
sentence] death.
566.031. 1. A person commits the offense of rape in the second degree if he or she
has sexual intercourse with another person knowing that he or she does so without that
person's consent.
2. The offense of rape in the second degree is [a class D felony] a felony for which
the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or death.
566.100. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual abuse in the first degree if he or
she subjects another person to sexual contact when that person is incapacitated, incapable of
consent, or lacks the capacity to consent, or by the use of forcible compulsion.
2. The offense of sexual abuse in the first degree is a [class C felony unless the victim
is less than fourteen years of age, or it is an aggravated sexual offense, in which case it is a
class B felony] felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life
imprisonment or death.
566.101. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual abuse in the second degree if he
or she purposely subjects another person to sexual contact without that person's consent.
2. The offense of sexual abuse in the second degree is a [class A misdemeanor, unless
it is an aggravated sexual offense, in which case it is a class E felony] felony for which the
authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or death.
566.151. 1. A person twenty-one years of age or older commits the offense of
enticement of a child if he or she persuades, solicits, coaxes, entices, or lures whether by
words, actions or through communication via the internet or any electronic communication,

HB 1688 3
any person who is less than seventeen years of age for the purpose of engaging in sexual
conduct.
2. It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this section that the other
person was a peace officer masquerading as a minor.
3. Enticement of a child or an attempt to commit enticement of a child is a felony for
which the authorized term of imprisonment [shall be not less than five years and not more
than thirty years. No person convicted under this section shall be eligible for parole,
probation, conditional release, or suspended imposition or execution of sentence for a period
of five calendar years] is life imprisonment or death.
566.206. 1. A person commits the offense of trafficking for the purposes of slavery,
involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced labor if he or she knowingly recruits, entices,
harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, including but not limited to through
the use of force, abduction, coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail, or causing or threatening to
cause financial harm, another person for labor or services, for the purposes of slavery,
involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced labor, or benefits, financially or by receiving
anything of value, from participation in such activities.
2. A person who is found guilty of the offense of trafficking for the purposes of
slavery, involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced labor shall not be required to register as a
sexual offender pursuant to the provisions of section 589.400, unless he or she is otherwise
required to register pursuant to the provisions of such section.
3. [Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section,] The offense of trafficking for
the purposes of slavery, involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced labor is a felony
[punishable by imprisonment for a] for which the authorized term of [years not less than
five years and not more than twenty years and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand
dollars.
4. If death results from a violation of this section, or if the violation includes
kidnapping or an attempt to kidnap, sexual abuse when punishable as a class B felony or an
attempt to commit sexual abuse when the sexual abuse attempted is punishable as a class B
felony, or an attempt to kill, it shall be punishable by imprisonment for a term of years not
less than five years or life and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars]
imprisonment is life imprisonment or death.
566.209. 1. A person commits the crime of trafficking for the purposes of sexual
exploitation if a person knowingly recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, advertises
the availability of or obtains by any means, including but not limited to through the use of
force, abduction, coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail, or causing or threatening to cause
financial harm, another person for the use or employment of such person in a commercial sex
act, sexual conduct, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as

HB 1688 4
defined in section 573.010, without his or her consent, or benefits, financially or by receiving
anything of value, from participation in such activities.
2. The crime of trafficking for the purposes of sexual exploitation is a felony
[punishable by imprisonment for a] for which the authorized term of [years not less than
five years and not more than twenty years and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty
thousand dollars. If a violation of this section was effected by force, abduction, or coercion,
the crime of trafficking for the purposes of sexual exploitation is a felony punishable by
imprisonment for a term of years not less than ten years or life and a fine not to exceed two
hundred fifty thousand dollars] imprisonment is life imprisonment or death.
566.210. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the first
degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, including
but not limited to through the use of force, abduction, coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail,
or causing or threatening to cause financial harm, a person under the age of fourteen to
participate in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
material as defined in section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving anything of
value, from participation in such activities;
(2) Causes a person under the age of fourteen to engage in a commercial sex act, a
sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as defined in section
573.010; or
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the age of fourteen to participate in a
commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as
defined in section 573.010.
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant believed that the person was fourteen
years of age or older.
3. The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree is a felony for which
the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for probation or
parole [until the offender has served not less than thirty years of such sentence. Subsection 4
of section 558.019 shall not apply to the sentence of a person who has been found guilty of
sexual trafficking of a child less than fourteen years of age, and] or death. "Life
imprisonment" shall mean imprisonment for the duration of a person's natural life for the
purposes of this section.
566.211. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the
second degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, including
but not limited to through the use of force, abduction, coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail,
or causing or threatening to cause financial harm, a person under the age of eighteen to

HB 1688 5
participate in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
material as defined in section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving anything of
value, from participation in such activities;
(2) Causes a person under the age of eighteen to engage in a commercial sex act, a
sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as defined in section
573.010; or
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the age of eighteen to participate in a
commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as
defined in section 573.010.
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant believed that the person was eighteen
years of age or older.
3. The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree is a felony
[punishable by imprisonment for a] for which the authorized term of [years not less than
twenty years or life and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars if the child is
under the age of eighteen. If a violation of this section was effected by force, abduction, or
coercion, the crime of sexual trafficking of a child shall be a felony for which the authorized
term of] imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole [until
the defendant has served not less than twenty-five years of such sentence] or death.
573.025. 1. A person commits the offense of promoting child pornography in the first
degree if, knowing of its content and character, such person possesses with the intent to
promote or promotes child pornography of a child less than fourteen years of age or obscene
material portraying what appears to be a child less than fourteen years of age.
2. The offense of promoting child pornography in the first degree is a [class B felony
unless the person knowingly promotes such material to a minor, in which case it is a class A
felony. No person who is found guilty of promoting child pornography in the first degree
shall be eligible for probation, parole, or conditional release for a period of three calendar
years] felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment
without eligibility for probation, parole, or conditional release or death.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a provider of electronic
communication services or remote computing services to monitor any user, subscriber or
customer of the provider, or the content of any communication of any user, subscriber or
customer of the provider.
573.035. 1. A person commits the offense of promoting child pornography in the
second degree if, knowing of its content and character, such person possesses with the intent
to promote or promotes child pornography of a minor under the age of eighteen or obscene
material portraying what appears to be a minor under the age of eighteen.

HB 1688 6
2. The offense of promoting child pornography in the second degree is a [class D
felony unless the person knowingly promotes such material to a minor, in which case it is a
class B felony. No person who is found guilty of promoting child pornography in the second
degree shall be eligible for probation] felony for which the authorized term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for probation, parole, or
conditional release or death.
573.037. 1. A person commits the offense of possession of child pornography if such
person knowingly or recklessly possesses any child pornography of a minor less than eighteen
years of age or obscene material portraying what appears to be a minor less than eighteen
years of age.
2. The offense of possession of child pornography is a [class D felony if the person
possesses one still image of child pornography or one obscene still image. The offense of
possession of child pornography is a class B felony if the person:
(1) Possesses:
(a) More than twenty still images of child pornography; or
(b) More than twenty obscene still images; or
(c) Child pornography comprised of one motion picture, film, videotape, videotape
production, or other moving image; or
(d) Obscene material comprised of one motion picture, film, videotape production, or
other moving image; or
(2) Has previously been found guilty of an offense under this section] felony for
which the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for
probation, parole, or conditional release or death.
3. A person who has committed the offense of possession of child pornography is
subject to separate punishments for each item of child pornography or obscene material
possessed by the person.
✔